Washington statutes.
RCW 41.16.030

Meetings.

The board shall meet at least once quarterly, the date to be fixed by regulation of the board, at such other regular times as may be fixed by a regulation of the board; and at any time upon call of the chairperson, of which due advance notice shall be given the other members of the board.

[ 2007 c 218 s 20; 2002 c 15 s 1; 1947 c 91 s 3; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 9578-42. Prior: 1929 c 86 s 1; 1919 c 196 s 3; 1909 c 50 s 3.]

NOTES:

Intent—Finding—2007 c 218: See note following RCW 41.08.020.